Utah statutes.
63G-2-701.   Political subdivisions may adopt ordinances in compliance with
chapter.
(1) (a)  Each political subdivision may adopt an ordinance or a policy
applicable throughout its jurisdiction relating to information practices
including classification, designation, access, denials, segregation, appeals,
management, retention, and amendment of records.
(b)  The ordinance or policy shall comply with the criteria set forth in this
section.
(c)  If any political subdivision does not adopt and maintain an ordinance or
policy, then that political subdivision is subject to this chapter.
(d)  Notwithstanding the adoption of an ordinance or policy, each political
subdivision is subject to Parts 1 and 3, and Sections 63A-12-105, 63A-12-107,
63G-2-201, 63G-2-202, 63G-2-205, 63G-2-206, 63G-2-601, and 63G-2-602.
(e)  Every ordinance, policy, or amendment to the ordinance or policy shall be
filed with the state archives no later than 30 days after its effective date.
(f)  The political subdivision shall also report to the state archives all
retention schedules, and all designations and classifications applied to
record series maintained by the political subdivision.
(g)  The report required by Subsection (1)(f) is notification to state
archives of the political subdivision's retention schedules, designations, and
classifications.  The report is not subject to approval by state archives.  If
state archives determines that a different retention schedule is needed for
state purposes, state archives shall notify the political subdivision of the
state's retention schedule for the records and shall maintain the records if
requested to do so under Subsection 63A-12-105(2).
(2)  Each ordinance or policy relating to information practices shall:
(a)  provide standards for the classification and designation of the records
of the political subdivision as public, private, controlled, or protected in
accordance with Part 3 of this chapter;
(b)  require the classification of the records of the political subdivision in
accordance with those standards;
(c)  provide guidelines for establishment of fees in accordance with Section
63G-2-203; and
(d)  provide standards for the management and retention of the records of the
political subdivision comparable to Section 63A-12-103.
(3) (a)  Each ordinance or policy shall establish access criteria, procedures,
and response times for requests to inspect, obtain, or amend records of the
political subdivision, and time limits for appeals consistent with this
chapter.
(b)  In establishing response times for access requests and time limits for
appeals, the political subdivision may establish reasonable time frames
different than those set out in Section 63G-2-204 and Part 4 of this chapter
if it determines that the resources of the political subdivision are
insufficient to meet the requirements of those sections.
(4) (a)  The political subdivision shall establish an appeals process for
persons aggrieved by classification, designation or access decisions.
(b)  The policy or ordinance shall provide for:
(i) (A)  an appeals board composed of the governing body of the political
subdivision; or
(B)  a separate appeals board composed of members of the governing body and
the public, appointed by the governing body; and
(ii)  the designation of a person as the chief administrative officer for
purposes of determining appeals under Section 63G-2-401 of the governmental
entity's determination.
(5)  If the requester concurs, the political subdivision may also provide for
an additional level of administrative review to the records committee in
accordance with Section 63G-2-403.
(6)  Appeals of the decisions of the appeals boards established by political
subdivisions shall be by petition for judicial review to the district court.
The contents of the petition for review and the conduct of the proceeding
shall be in accordance with Sections 63G-2-402 and 63G-2-404.
(7)  Any political subdivision that adopts an ordinance or policy under
Subsection (1) shall forward to state archives a copy and summary description
of the ordinance or policy.
